Illinois, session 104th, HB5290.
Be it enacted by the People of the State of Illinois, 3represented in the General Assembly: 4    Section 5. The Sales Finance Agency Act is amended by 5changing Sections 2, 4, 6.1, 10.2, 10.6, 12, 13, 15.5, 16.5, 617, and 19 and by adding Sections 3.5, 4.1, 4.2, 4.3, 4.4, 4.5, 74.6, 6.2, 6.3, 6.4, 6.5, 6.6, 6.7, 6.8, 10.7, 10.8, 13.5, and 814.5 as follows: 9    (205 ILCS 660/2)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5202)10    Sec. 2. Definitions. In this Act, unless the context 11otherwise requires:12    "Sales finance agency" means a person, irrespective of his 13or her state of domicile or place of business, engaged in this 14State, in whole or in part, in the business of purchasing, or 15making loans secured by, retail installment contracts, retail 16charge agreements or the outstanding balances under such 17contracts or agreements entered into in this State.18    "Holder" of a retail installment contract or a retail 19charge agreement means the retail seller of the goods or 20services under the contract or charge agreement, or if the 21outstanding balances thereunder are purchased by or 22transferred as security to a sales finance agency or other 23assignee, the sales finance agency or other assignee.  HB5290 Enrolled- 2 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, 2limited liability company, joint venture, or any other form of 3business association.4    "Department" means the Department of Financial and 5Professional Regulation Institutions.6    "Director" means the Director of Financial Institutions.7    "Holder" of a retail installment contract or a retail 8charge agreement means the retail seller of the goods or 9services under the contract or charge agreement, or if the 10outstanding balances thereunder are purchased by or 11transferred as security to a sales finance agency or other 12assignee, the sales finance agency or other assignee. 13    "Motor Vehicle Retail Installment Sales Act" and "Retail 14Installment Sales Act" refer to the Acts having those titles 15enacted by the 75th General Assembly.16    "Person" means an individual, corporation, partnership, 17limited liability company, joint venture, or any other form of 18business association. 19    "Retail installment contract" and "retail charge 20agreement" have the meanings ascribed to them in the Motor 21Vehicle Retail Installment Sales Act and the Retail 22Installment Sales Act.23    "Sales finance agency" means a person, irrespective of the 24person's state of domicile or place of business, engaged in 25this State, in whole or in part, in the business of purchasing 26or making loans secured by retail installment contracts,   HB5290 Enrolled- 3 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1retail charge agreements, or the outstanding balances under 2such contracts or agreements entered into in this State.3    "Secretary" means the Secretary of Financial and 4Professional Regulation or the Secretary's designee. The 5Director of the Division of Financial Institutions of the 6Department of Financial and Professional Regulation is a 7designee of the Secretary under this Act. 8    "Special purpose vehicle" means an entity that, in 9connection with a securitization, private placement, or 10similar type of investment transaction, is administered by a 11State or national bank under a management agreement for the 12purpose of purchasing, making loans against, or in pools of, 13receivables, general intangibles, and other financial assets 14including retail installment contracts, retail charge 15agreements, or the outstanding balances or any portion of the 16outstanding balances under those contracts or agreements.17    "Net Worth" means total assets minus total liabilities.18(Source: P.A. 89-400, eff. 8-20-95; 90-437, eff. 1-1-98.) 19    (205 ILCS 660/3.5 new)20    Sec. 3.5. License application; Nationwide Multistate 21Licensing System and Registry. 22    (a) Applicants for a license shall apply in a form 23prescribed by the Secretary. Each form shall contain content 24as set forth by rule, instruction, or procedure of the 25Department and may be changed or updated as necessary by the   HB5290 Enrolled- 4 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1Department to carry out the purposes of this Act.2    (b) To fulfill the purposes of this Act, the Secretary is 3authorized to establish relationships or contracts with the 4Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry or other 5entities designated by the Nationwide Multistate Licensing 6System and Registry to collect and maintain records and 7process transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or 8other persons subject to this Act.9    (c) In connection with an application for licensing, the 10applicant may be required, at a minimum, to furnish to the 11Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry 12information concerning the applicant's identity, including 13personal history and experience in a form prescribed by the 14Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, including 15the submission of authorization for the Nationwide Multistate 16Licensing System and Registry and the Secretary to obtain:17        (1) an independent credit report obtained from a 18    consumer reporting agency described in Section 603(p) of 19    the Fair Credit Reporting Act, 15 U.S.C. 1681a(p); and20        (2) information related to any administrative, civil, 21    or criminal findings by any governmental jurisdiction.22    (d) For the purposes of this Section, and in order to 23reduce the points of contact that the Secretary may have to 24maintain for purposes of paragraph (2) of subsection (c), the 25Secretary may use the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System 26and Registry as a channeling agent for requesting and   HB5290 Enrolled- 5 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1distributing information to and from any source as directed by 2the Secretary. 3    (205 ILCS 660/4)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5204)4    Sec. 4. After December 31, 1967, a person who is required 5to be licensed under this Act must display at each of his 6places of business, both physical and digital, a 7non-transferable and non-assignable license. A licensee who 8operates more than one place of business may obtain additional 9licenses upon compliance with this Act as to each place of 10business. Application for a license must be on a form 11prescribed and furnished by the Department. A licensee may 12move his place or places of business from one location to 13another within a county without obtaining a new license if he 14gives the Department at least 10 days' prior written notice of 15the relocation.16(Source: P.A. 90-437, eff. 1-1-98.) 17    (205 ILCS 660/4.1 new)18    Sec. 4.1. Licensee name. No person, partnership, 19association, corporation, limited liability company, or other 20entity engaged in a business regulated by this Act shall 21operate the business under a name other than the real names of 22the entity and individuals conducting the business. The 23business may, in addition, operate under an assumed corporate 24name pursuant to the Business Corporation Act of 1983, an   HB5290 Enrolled- 6 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1assumed limited liability company name pursuant to the Limited 2Liability Company Act, or an assumed business name pursuant to 3the Assumed Business Name Act. 4    (205 ILCS 660/4.2 new)5    Sec. 4.2. License application process; investigation. 6    (a) The Secretary may issue a license upon completion of 7all of the following:8        (1) the filing of an application for a license with 9    the Secretary or the Nationwide Multistate Licensing 10    System and Registry as required by the Secretary;11        (2) the filing with the Secretary of a listing of 12    judgments entered against and bankruptcy petitions by the 13    license applicant for the preceding 10 years;14        (3) the filing of an audited balance sheet, including 15    all footnotes prepared by a certified public accountant in 16    accordance with generally accepted accounting principles 17    and generally accepted auditing standards; notwithstanding 18    the requirements of this subsection, an applicant that is 19    a subsidiary may submit audited consolidated financial 20    statements of its parent, intermediary parent, or ultimate 21    parent if the consolidated statements are supported by 22    consolidating statements that include the applicant's 23    financial statement; if the consolidating statements are 24    unaudited, the applicant's chief financial officer shall 25    attest to the applicant's financial statements disclosed   HB5290 Enrolled- 7 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    in the consolidating statements; and2        (4) an investigation of the averments required by 3    Section 4.4 which investigation must allow the Secretary 4    to issue positive findings stating that the financial 5    responsibility, experience, character, and general fitness 6    of the license applicant; of the members if the license 7    applicant is a partnership or association; of the officers 8    and directors if the license applicant is a corporation; 9    and of the managers and members that retain any authority 10    or responsibility under the operating agreement if the 11    license applicant is a limited liability company are such 12    as to command the confidence of the community and to 13    warrant belief that the business will be operated 14    honestly, fairly, and efficiently within the purpose of 15    this Act; if the Secretary does not so find, the Secretary 16    shall not issue the license and shall notify the license 17    applicant of the denial. The Secretary may impose 18    conditions on a license if the Secretary determines that 19    those conditions are necessary or appropriate. These 20    conditions shall be imposed in writing and shall continue 21    in effect for a period prescribed by the Secretary.22    (b) All licenses shall be issued to the license applicant. 23Upon receipt of the license, a sales finance agency licensee 24shall be authorized to engage in the business regulated by 25this Act. The license shall remain in full force and effect 26until it expires, it is surrendered by the licensee, or it is   HB5290 Enrolled- 8 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1revoked or suspended as provided by this Act.2    (c) The Secretary may, for good cause shown, waive, in 3part, any of the requirements of this Section. 4    (205 ILCS 660/4.3 new)5    Sec. 4.3. License application form. 6    (a) An application for a sales finance agency license must 7be made in accordance with Section 4.2 and, if applicable, in 8accordance with requirements of the Nationwide Multistate 9Licensing System and Registry. The application shall be in 10writing, under oath, and on a form obtained from and 11prescribed by the Secretary, or may be submitted 12electronically with attestation to the Nationwide Multistate 13Licensing System and Registry.14    (b) The application shall contain the name and complete 15business and residential address or addresses of the license 16applicant. If the license applicant is a partnership, 17association, corporation, or other form of business 18organization, the application shall contain the names and 19complete business and residential addresses of each member, 20director, and principal officer of the business. The 21application shall also include a description of the activities 22of the license applicant in such detail and for such periods as 23the Secretary may require, including all of the following:24        (1) an affirmation of financial solvency noting such 25    capitalization requirements as may be required by the   HB5290 Enrolled- 9 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    Secretary and access to such credit as may be required by 2    the Secretary;3        (2) proof in a form satisfactory to the Secretary that 4    the applicant has and will maintain a positive net worth 5    of a minimum of $30,000;6        (3) an applicant shall submit to the Secretary with 7    the application for a license and every licensee shall 8    maintain a bond to be approved by the Secretary in which 9    the applicant shall be the obligor, in the sum of $50,000 10    or such additional amount as required by the Secretary 11    based on the sales finance agency activity of the licensee 12    in the previous year, and in which an insurance company 13    that is duly authorized by this State to transact the 14    business of fidelity and surety insurance shall be a 15    surety. The surety bond shall run to the Secretary and 16    shall be for the benefit of the Department and of any 17    consumer who incurs damages as a result of any violation 18    of this Act or rules adopted pursuant to this Act by a 19    licensee;20        (4) an affirmation that the license applicant or its 21    members, directors, or principals, as may be appropriate, 22    are at least 18 years of age;23        (5) information as to the character, fitness, 24    financial and business responsibility, background, 25    experience, and criminal record of any:26            (A) person, entity, or ultimate equitable owner   HB5290 Enrolled- 10 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1        that owns or controls, directly or indirectly, 10% or 2        more of any class of stock of the license applicant;3            (B) person, entity, or ultimate equitable owner 4        that is not a depository institution, as defined in 5        Section 1007.50 of the Savings Bank Act, that lends, 6        provides, or infuses, directly or indirectly, in any 7        way, funds to or into a license applicant in an amount 8        equal to or more than 10% of the license applicant's 9        net worth;10            (C) person, entity, or ultimate equitable owner 11        that controls, directly or indirectly, the election of 12        25% or more of the members of the board of directors of 13        a license applicant; and14            (D) person, entity, or ultimate equitable owner 15        that the Secretary finds influences management of the 16        license applicant; the provisions of this subparagraph 17        shall not apply to a public official serving on the 18        board of directors of a State guaranty agency; and19        (6) any other information the Secretary reasonably 20    deems necessary to include in the application. 21    (205 ILCS 660/4.4 new)22    Sec. 4.4. Averments of applicant. Each application for 23license shall be accompanied by the following averments 24stating that the applicant:25        (1) will file with the Secretary or Nationwide   HB5290 Enrolled- 11 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    Multistate Licensing System and Registry, as applicable, 2    any report or reports that it is required to file under any 3    of the provisions of this Act when due;4        (2) has not committed a crime against the law of this 5    State, any other state, or of the United States involving 6    moral turpitude or fraudulent or dishonest dealing, and 7    that no final judgment has been entered against it in a 8    civil action upon grounds of fraud, misrepresentation, or 9    deceit that has not been previously reported to the 10    Secretary;11        (3) has not engaged in any conduct that would be cause 12    for denial of a license;13        (4) has not become insolvent;14        (5) has not submitted an application for a license 15    under this Act that contains a material misstatement;16        (6) has not demonstrated by course of conduct, 17    negligence or incompetence in performing any act for which 18    it is required to hold a license under this Act;19        (7) will advise the Secretary in writing or the 20    Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and Registry, as 21    applicable, of any changes to the information submitted on 22    the most recent application for license or averments of 23    record within 30 days after the change; the written notice 24    must be signed in the same form as the application for the 25    license being amended;26        (8) will comply with the provisions of this Act and   HB5290 Enrolled- 12 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    with any lawful order, rule, or regulation made or issued 2    under the provisions of this Act;3        (9) will submit to periodic examination by the 4    Secretary as required by this Act; and5        (10) will advise the Secretary in writing of judgments 6    entered against and bankruptcy petitions by the license 7    applicant within 5 days after the occurrence.8    A licensee who fails to fulfill the obligations of an 9averment, fails to comply with averments made, or otherwise 10violates any of the averments made under this Section shall be 11subject to the penalties of this Act. 12    (205 ILCS 660/4.5 new)13    Sec. 4.5. Refusal to issue license. The Secretary may 14refuse to issue or renew a license if:15        (1) it is determined that the applicant is not in 16    compliance with any provisions of this Act;17        (2) there is substantial continuity between the 18    applicant and any violator of this Act; or19        (3) the Secretary cannot make the findings specified 20    in Section 4.4. 21    (205 ILCS 660/4.6 new)22    Sec. 4.6. License renewal; fees. 23    (a) Licenses shall be renewed every year using the common 24renewal date of the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and   HB5290 Enrolled- 13 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1Registry, as required by the Secretary. Properly completed 2renewal application forms and filing fees may be received by 3the Secretary 60 days before the license expiration date, but 4to be deemed timely, the completed renewal application forms 5and filing fees must be received by the Secretary no later than 630 days before the license expiration date.7    (b) It shall be the responsibility of each licensee to 8accomplish renewal of its license. Failure by a licensee to 9submit a properly completed renewal application form and fees 10in a timely fashion, absent a written extension from the 11Secretary, shall result in the license becoming inactive.12    (c) No activity regulated by this Act shall be conducted 13by the licensee when a license becomes inactive. An inactive 14license may be reactivated by the Secretary, at the 15Secretary's discretion, upon payment of a renewal fee, payment 16of a reactivation fee equal to the renewal fee, and proof of 17good cause for failure to renew. Request for reactivation of a 18license must be submitted no more than 90 days after 19expiration of license.20    (d) A licensee ceasing an activity or activities regulated 21by this Act and desiring to no longer be licensed shall inform 22the Secretary in writing and, at the same time, convey any 23license issued and all other symbols or indicia of licensure. 24The licensee shall include a plan for the withdrawal from the 25regulated business, including a timetable for the disposition 26of the business, and comply with the surrender guidelines or   HB5290 Enrolled- 14 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1rules of the Department. Upon receipt of such written notice, 2the Secretary shall post the cancellation or issue a certified 3statement canceling the license.4    (e) The expenses of administering this Act, including 5investigations and examinations provided for in this Act, 6shall be borne by and assessed against entities regulated by 7this Act. The fees listed in this Section shall be payable to 8the Department or to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing 9System and Registry for transfer to the required recipients by 10the Secretary. The Secretary shall specify the form of payment 11to the Department or to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing 12System and Registry, which may include certified check, money 13order, credit card, or other forms of payment authorized by 14the Secretary. The Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and 15Registry shall be authorized to collect and process 16transaction fees or other fees related to licensees or other 17persons subject to this Act.18    (f) Applicants and licensees shall be subject to the 19following fees:20        (1) For each application for an initial company 21    license, the applicant shall pay a nonrefundable initial 22    application fee of $1,000 and a nonrefundable background 23    investigation fee of $800.24        (2) For each application for an annual renewal of a 25    company license, the applicant shall pay a nonrefundable 26    renewal fee of $300.  HB5290 Enrolled- 15 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1        (3) For each application for an initial branch 2    license, the applicant shall pay a nonrefundable initial 3    application fee of $100.4        (4) For each application for an annual renewal of a 5    branch license, the applicant shall pay a nonrefundable 6    renewal fee of $100.7        (5) The licensee shall pay a nonrefundable fee of 8    $1,000 for each notice of change of ownership or control 9    filed.10        (6) The licensee shall pay a nonrefundable fee of $50 11    for each notice of change of officers or directors or 12    change of name or address filed.13        (7) Any licensee or person who delivers a check or 14    other payment to the Department that is returned unpaid by 15    the financial institution upon which it is drawn shall pay 16    to the Department, in addition to the amount already owed, 17    a fee of $50.18        (8) Time expended in the conduct of any examination of 19    the affairs of any licensee or its affiliates shall be 20    billed by the Department at a rate of $1,200 per examiner 21    day. Examination fees shall be billed following completion 22    of the examination and shall be paid within 30 days after 23    receipt of the billing.24        (9) If out-of-state travel occurs in the conduct of 25    any examination, the licensee shall make arrangements to 26    reimburse the Department for all charges for services,   HB5290 Enrolled- 16 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    including travel expenses such as airfare, hotel, and per 2    diem expenses incurred by the employee. These expenses are 3    to be in accord with applicable travel regulations 4    published by the Department of Central Management Services 5    and approved by the Governor's Travel Control Board.6        (10) Each licensee shall pay to the Department its pro 7    rata share of the cost for administration of this Act that 8    exceeds other fees listed in this Section, as estimated by 9    the Department, for the current year and any deficit 10    actually incurred in the administration of this Act in the 11    previous 3 years. The calculation method for each 12    licensee's pro rata share shall be established by rule.13    (g) The expenses of administering this Act, including 14licensing, investigations, and examinations provided for in 15this Act, shall be borne by and assessed against persons and 16entities regulated by this Act in such proportions and in such 17manner as the Secretary deems appropriate. The Secretary may 18establish by rule the category and amount of any fees that such 19persons and entities must pay to the Department.20    (h) Any fees set forth in this Act may be amended by rule. 21    (205 ILCS 660/6.1)22    Sec. 6.1. Financial Institution Fund. All moneys received 23by the Secretary under this Act in conjunction with the 24provisions relating to sales finance agencies shall be paid 25into the Financial Institution Fund, and all expenses incurred   HB5290 Enrolled- 17 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1by the Secretary under this Act in conjunction with the 2provisions relating to sales finance agencies shall be paid 3from the Financial Institution Fund. All moneys received by 4the Department of Financial Institutions under this Act shall 5be deposited in the Financial Institution Fund created under 6Section 6z-26 of the State Finance Act.7(Source: P.A. 98-463, eff. 8-16-13.) 8    (205 ILCS 660/6.2 new)9    Sec. 6.2. Secretary of Financial and Professional 10Regulation; functions and powers. The functions and powers of 11the Secretary shall include the following:12        (1) to issue or refuse to issue any license as 13    provided by this Act;14        (2) to revoke or suspend for cause any license issued 15    under this Act;16        (3) to keep records of all licenses issued under this 17    Act;18        (4) to receive, consider, investigate, and act upon 19    complaints made by any person in connection with any 20    licensed sales finance agency in this State or unlicensed 21    sales finance agency activity;22        (5) to prescribe the forms of and receive:23            (A) applications for licenses; and24            (B) all reports and all books and records required 25        to be made by any licensee under this Act, including   HB5290 Enrolled- 18 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1        annual audited financial statements and annual reports 2        of sales finance agency activity;3        (6) to subpoena documents and witnesses and compel 4    their attendance and production of documents, to 5    administer oaths, and to require the production of any 6    books, papers, written reports, or other materials 7    relevant to any inquiry authorized by this Act;8        (7) to issue orders against any person:9            (A) if the Secretary has reasonable cause to 10        believe that an unsafe, unsound, or unlawful practice 11        has occurred, is occurring, or is about to occur;12            (B) if any person has violated, is violating, or 13        is about to violate any law, rule, or written 14        agreement with the Secretary; or15            (C) for the purpose of administering the 16        provisions of this Act and any rule adopted in 17        accordance with this Act;18        (8) to address any inquiries to any licensee, or the 19    officers of the licensee, in relation to the licensee's 20    activities and conditions or any other matter connected 21    with its affairs, and it shall be the duty of any licensee 22    or person so addressed to promptly reply in writing to 23    those inquiries; the Secretary may also require reports 24    from any licensee at any time the Secretary chooses;25        (9) to examine the books and records of every licensee 26    under this Act;  HB5290 Enrolled- 19 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1        (10) to enforce the provisions of this Act;2        (11) to levy fees, fines, and charges for services 3    performed in administering this Act; the aggregate of all 4    fees collected by the Secretary on and after the effective 5    date of this amendatory Act of the 104th General Assembly 6    shall be paid promptly after receipt, accompanied by a 7    detailed statement of fees paid, into the Financial 8    Institutions Fund; the amounts deposited into that Fund 9    shall be used for the ordinary and contingent expenses of 10    the Department; nothing in this Act shall prevent the 11    continuation of the practice of paying expenses involving 12    salaries, retirement, social security, and State-paid 13    insurance of State officers by appropriation from the 14    General Revenue Fund or any other fund;15        (12) to appoint examiners, supervisors, experts, and 16    special assistants as needed to effectively and 17    efficiently administer this Act;18        (13) to conduct hearings for the purpose of:19            (A) appeals of orders of the Secretary;20            (B) suspensions or revocations of licenses;21            (C) fining of licensees or unlicensed persons or 22        entities;23            (D) investigating complaints against licensees or 24        unlicensed persons or entities; or25            (E) carrying out the purposes of this Act;26        (14) to exercise visitorial power over a licensee;  HB5290 Enrolled- 20 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1        (15) to enter into cooperative agreements with state 2    regulatory authorities of other states to provide for 3    examination of corporate offices or branches of those 4    states and to accept reports of those examinations;5        (16) to assign an examiner or examiners to monitor the 6    affairs of a licensee with whatever frequency the 7    Secretary determines appropriate and to charge the 8    licensee for reasonable and necessary expenses of the 9    Secretary if in the opinion of the Secretary an emergency 10    exists or appears likely to occur;11        (17) to impose civil penalties of up to $50 per day 12    against a licensee for failing to respond to a regulatory 13    request or reporting requirement; and14        (18) to enter into agreements necessary to implement, 15    administer, or enforce this Act, including in connection 16    with the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and 17    Registry. 18    (205 ILCS 660/6.3 new)19    Sec. 6.3. Examination; prohibited activities. 20    (a) The business affairs of a licensee under this Act 21shall be examined for compliance with this Act as often as the 22Secretary deems necessary and proper. The Department may adopt 23rules with respect to the frequency and manner of examination. 24The Secretary shall appoint a suitable person to perform an 25examination. The Secretary and the Secretary's appointees may   HB5290 Enrolled- 21 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1examine the entire books, records, documents, and operations 2of each licensee and its subsidiary, affiliate, or agent and 3may examine any of the licensee's or its subsidiaries', 4affiliates', or agents' officers, directors, employees, and 5agents under oath.6    (b) The Secretary shall prepare a sufficiently detailed 7report of each licensee's examination, shall issue a copy of 8the report to the licensee, and shall take appropriate steps 9to ensure correction of violations of this Act.10    (c) Affiliates of a licensee shall be subject to 11examination by the Secretary on the same terms as the 12licensee, but only when reports from or examination of a 13licensee provides for documented evidence of unlawful activity 14between a licensee and affiliate benefiting, affecting, or 15deriving from the activities regulated by this Act.16    (d) The expenses of any examination of the licensee and 17affiliates shall be borne by the licensee and assessed by the 18Secretary as set forth in this Act or by rule.19    (e) All confidential supervisory information, including 20the examination report and the work papers of the report, 21shall belong to the Secretary's office and may not be 22disclosed to anyone other than the licensee, law enforcement 23officials, or other regulatory agencies that have an 24appropriate regulatory interest as determined by the Secretary 25or to a party presenting a lawful subpoena to the Department. 26The Secretary may, through the Attorney General, immediately   HB5290 Enrolled- 22 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1appeal to the court of jurisdiction the disclosure of such 2confidential supervisory information and seek a stay of the 3subpoena pending the outcome of the appeal. Reports required 4of licensees by the Secretary under this Act and results of 5examinations performed by the Secretary under this Act shall 6be the property of only the Secretary, but may be shared with 7the licensee. Access under this Act to the books and records of 8each licensee shall be limited to the Secretary and the 9Secretary's agents as provided in this Act and to the licensee 10and its authorized agents and designees. No other person shall 11have access to the books and records of a licensee under this 12Act. Any person upon whom a demand for production of 13confidential supervisory information is made, whether by 14subpoena, order, or other judicial or administrative process, 15must withhold production of the confidential supervisory 16information and must notify the Secretary of the demand, at 17which time the Secretary is authorized to intervene for the 18purpose of enforcing the limitations of this Section or 19seeking the withdrawal or termination of the attempt to compel 20production of the confidential supervisory information. The 21Secretary may impose any conditions and limitations on the 22disclosure of confidential supervisory information that are 23necessary to protect the confidentiality of that information. 24Except as authorized by the Secretary, no person obtaining 25access to confidential supervisory information may make a copy 26of the confidential supervisory information. The Secretary may   HB5290 Enrolled- 23 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1condition a decision to disclose confidential supervisory 2information on entry of a protective order by the court or 3administrative tribunal presiding in the particular case or on 4a written agreement of confidentiality. In a case in which a 5protective order or agreement has already been entered between 6parties other than the Secretary, the Secretary may 7nevertheless condition approval for release of confidential 8supervisory information upon the inclusion of additional or 9amended provisions in the protective order. The Secretary may 10authorize a party who obtained the records for use in one case 11to provide them to another party in another case, subject to 12any conditions that the Secretary may impose on either or both 13parties. The requester shall promptly notify other parties to 14a case of the release of confidential supervisory information 15obtained and, upon entry of a protective order, shall provide 16copies of confidential supervisory information to the other 17parties. 18    (205 ILCS 660/6.4 new)19    Sec. 6.4. Retail Installment Sales Act; Motor Vehicle 20Retail Installment Sales Act. 21    (a) A sales finance agency may not aid or seek to aid any 22person in the violation of the Retail Installment Sales Act or 23the Motor Vehicle Retail Installment Sales Act.24    (b) A sales finance agency may not purchase any retail 25installment contract, any retail charge agreement, or evidence   HB5290 Enrolled- 24 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1of indebtedness thereunder that violates the Retail 2Installment Sales Act or the Motor Vehicle Retail Installment 3Sales Act.4    (c) A sales finance agency may not purchase any retail 5installment contract, any retail charge agreement, or evidence 6of indebtedness thereunder with actual knowledge that the 7contract, agreement, or indebtedness violates the Retail 8Installment Sales Act or the Motor Vehicle Retail Installment 9Sales Act.10    (d) A sales finance agency may not purchase a retail 11installment contract creating or providing for a security 12interest in a motor vehicle that qualifies as consumer goods 13under the Uniform Commercial Code, or purchase of the evidence 14of indebtedness under such a contract, from a person who is not 15licensed under the Illinois Vehicle Code, not licensed under 16this Act, and not exempt from licensure under this Act. 17    (205 ILCS 660/6.5 new)18    Sec. 6.5. Investigation of complaints. The Secretary may 19receive, record, and investigate complaints and inquiries made 20by any person concerning this Act and any licensees under this 21Act. Each licensee shall open its books, records, documents, 22and offices wherever situated to the Secretary or the 23Secretary's appointees as needed to facilitate such 24investigations.   HB5290 Enrolled- 25 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    (205 ILCS 660/6.6 new)2    Sec. 6.6. Additional investigation and examination 3authority. In addition to any authority allowed under this 4Act, the Secretary shall have the authority to conduct 5investigations and examinations as follows:6        (1) For purposes of initial licensing, license 7    renewal, license suspension, license conditioning, license 8    revocation or termination, or general or specific inquiry 9    or investigation to determine compliance with this Act, 10    the Secretary shall have the authority to access, receive, 11    and use any books, accounts, records, files, documents, 12    information, or evidence, including, but not limited to, 13    the following:14            (A) criminal, civil, and administrative history 15        information, including nonconviction data as specified 16        in the Criminal Code of 2012;17            (B) personal history and experience information, 18        including independent credit reports obtained from a 19        consumer reporting agency described in Section 603(p) 20        of the federal Fair Credit Reporting Act; and21            (C) any other documents, information, or evidence 22        the Secretary deems relevant to the inquiry or 23        investigation, regardless of the location, possession, 24        control, or custody of the documents, information, or 25        evidence.26        (2) For the purposes of investigating violations or   HB5290 Enrolled- 26 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    complaints arising under this Act or for the purposes of 2    examination, the Secretary may review, investigate, or 3    examine any licensee, individual, or person subject to 4    this Act as often as necessary in order to carry out the 5    purposes of this Act. The Secretary may direct, subpoena, 6    or order the attendance of and examine under oath all 7    persons whose testimony may be required about the business 8    or subject matter of any such examination or investigation 9    and may direct, subpoena, or order the person to produce 10    books, accounts, records, files, and any other documents 11    the Secretary deems relevant to the inquiry.12        (3) Each licensee, individual, or person subject to 13    this Act shall make available to the Secretary upon 14    request the books and records relating to the operations 15    of the licensee, individual, or person subject to this 16    Act. The Secretary shall have access to those books and 17    records and may interview the officers, principals, 18    employees, independent contractors, agents, and customers 19    of the licensee, individual, or person subject to this Act 20    concerning the business of the licensee, individual, or 21    person.22        (4) Each licensee, individual, or person subject to 23    this Act shall make or compile reports or prepare other 24    information as directed by the Secretary in order to carry 25    out the purposes of this Section, including, but not 26    limited to:  HB5290 Enrolled- 27 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1            (A) accounting compilations;2            (B) information lists and data concerning sales 3        finance agency activity in a format prescribed by the 4        Secretary; or5            (C) other information deemed necessary to carry 6        out the purposes of this Section.7        (5) In making any examination or investigation 8    authorized by this Act, the Secretary may control access 9    to any documents and records of the licensee or person 10    under examination or investigation. The Secretary may take 11    possession of the documents and records or place a person 12    in exclusive charge of the documents and records in the 13    place where they are usually kept. During the period of 14    control, no person shall remove or attempt to remove any 15    of the documents or records, except pursuant to a court 16    order or with the consent of the Secretary. Unless the 17    Secretary has reasonable grounds to believe the documents 18    or records of the licensee have been or are at risk of 19    being altered or destroyed for purposes of concealing a 20    violation of this Act, the licensee or owner of the 21    documents and records shall have access to the documents 22    or records as necessary to conduct its ordinary business 23    affairs.24        (6) In order to carry out the purposes of this 25    Section, the Secretary may:26            (A) retain attorneys, accountants, or other   HB5290 Enrolled- 28 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1        professionals and specialists as examiners, auditors, 2        or investigators to conduct or assist in the conduct 3        of examinations or investigations;4            (B) enter into agreements or relationships with 5        other government officials or regulatory associations 6        in order to improve efficiencies and reduce regulatory 7        burden by sharing resources, standardized or uniform 8        methods or procedures, and documents, records, 9        information, or evidence obtained under this Section;10            (C) use, hire, contract, or employ publicly or 11        privately available analytical systems, methods, or 12        software to examine or investigate the licensee, 13        individual, or person subject to this Act;14            (D) accept and rely on examination or 15        investigation reports made by other government 16        officials within or outside this State; or17            (E) accept audit reports made by an independent 18        certified public accountant for the licensee, 19        individual, or person subject to this Act in the 20        course of that part of the examination covering the 21        same general subject matter as the audit and may 22        incorporate the audit report in the report of the 23        examination, report of investigation, or other writing 24        of the Secretary.25        (7) The authority of this Section shall remain in 26    effect if a licensee, individual, or person subject to   HB5290 Enrolled- 29 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    this Act acts or claims to act under any licensing or 2    registration law of this State or claims to act without 3    the authority.4        (8) No licensee, individual, or person subject to 5    investigation or examination under this Section may 6    knowingly withhold, abstract, remove, mutilate, destroy, 7    or secrete any books, records, computer records, or other 8    information. 9    (205 ILCS 660/6.7 new)10    Sec. 6.7. Confidential information. In hearings conducted 11under this Act, information presented into evidence that was 12acquired by the licensee when serving any individual in 13connection with sales finance agency activity, including all 14financial information of the individual, shall be deemed 15strictly confidential and shall be made available only as part 16of the record of a hearing under this Act or otherwise: (i) 17when the record is required, in its entirety, for purposes of 18judicial review or (ii) upon the express written consent of 19the individual served, or in the case of the individual's 20death or disability, the consent of the individual's personal 21representative. 22    (205 ILCS 660/6.8 new)23    Sec. 6.8. Information sharing. In order to promote more 24effective regulation and reduce regulatory burden through   HB5290 Enrolled- 30 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1supervisory information sharing:2        (1) Except as otherwise provided in any federal law or 3    State law regarding the privacy or confidentiality of any 4    information or material provided to the Nationwide 5    Multistate Licensing System and Registry, any privilege 6    arising under federal or State law, including the rules of 7    any federal or State court, with respect to such 8    information or material shall continue to apply to 9    information or material after the information or material 10    has been disclosed to the Nationwide Multistate Licensing 11    System and Registry. The information and material may be 12    shared with all State and federal regulatory officials 13    with relevant oversight authority without the loss of 14    privilege or the loss of confidentiality protections 15    provided by federal law or State law.16        (2) The Secretary is authorized to enter into 17    agreements or sharing arrangements with other governmental 18    agencies, the Conference of State Bank Supervisors, or 19    other associations representing governmental agencies as 20    established by rule or order of the Department. The 21    sharing of confidential supervisory information or any 22    information or material described in paragraph (1) 23    pursuant to an agreement or sharing arrangement shall not 24    result in the loss of privilege or the loss of 25    confidentiality protections provided by federal law or 26    State law.  HB5290 Enrolled- 31 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1        (3) Information or material that is subject to a 2    privilege or confidentiality under paragraph (1) shall not 3    be subject to the following:4            (A) disclosure under any State law governing the 5        disclosure to the public of information held by an 6        officer or an agency of the State; or7            (B) subpoena, discovery, or admission into 8        evidence in any private civil action or administrative 9        process, unless with respect to any privilege held by 10        the Nationwide Multistate Licensing System and 11        Registry with respect to the information or material, 12        the person to whom such information or material 13        pertains waives, in whole or in part, in the 14        discretion of that person, that privilege.15        (4) Any other law relating to the disclosure of 16    confidential supervisory information or any information or 17    material described in paragraph (1) that is inconsistent 18    with paragraph (1) shall be superseded by the requirements 19    of this Section to the extent the other law provides less 20    confidentiality or a weaker privilege. 21    (205 ILCS 660/10.2)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5225)22    Sec. 10.2. Closing of business; surrender of license. At 23least 10 days prior to a licensee ceasing operations, closing 24business, or filing for bankruptcy, the licensee shall:25    (a) Notify the Department of its action in writing.  HB5290 Enrolled- 32 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    (b) With the exception of filing for bankruptcy, surrender 2its license to the Secretary Director for cancellation. The 3surrender of the license shall not affect the licensee's civil 4or criminal liability for acts committed prior to surrender or 5entitle the licensee to a return of any part of the annual 6license fee.7    (c) The licensee shall notify the department of the 8location where the books, accounts, contracts, and records 9will be maintained and the procedure to ensure prompt return 10of contracts, titles, and releases to the customers.11    (d) The accounts, books, records, and contracts shall be 12maintained and serviced by the licensee or another licensee 13under this Act, or an entity exempt from licensure under this 14Act.15    (e) The Department shall have the authority to conduct 16examinations of the books, records, and loan documents at any 17time after surrender of the license, filing of bankruptcy, or 18the cessation of operations.19(Source: P.A. 90-437, eff. 1-1-98; 90-575, eff. 3-20-98.) 20    (205 ILCS 660/10.6)21    Sec. 10.6. Companion animals. 22    (a) No sales finance agency shall purchase:23        (1) a retail installment contract for the sale of a 24    canine or feline;25        (2) a retail charge agreement for the sale of a canine   HB5290 Enrolled- 33 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    or feline; or2        (3) the outstanding balance under a retail installment 3    contract or a retail charge agreement for the sale of a 4    canine or feline.5    (b) No sales finance agency shall make a loan secured by:6        (1) a retail installment contract for the sale of a 7    canine or feline;8        (2) a retail charge agreement for the sale of a canine 9    or feline; or10        (3) the outstanding balance under a retail installment 11    contract or a retail charge agreements for the sale of a 12    canine or feline.13    (c) Any sales finance agency that purchases a contract or 14agreement subject to subsection (a) or makes a loan subject to 15subsection (b) has no right to collect, receive, or retain any 16principal, interest, or charges related to the contract, 17agreement, or loan, and any such loan is null and void.18    (d) The changes made to this Section by this amendatory 19Act of the 103rd General Assembly shall apply prospectively 20and shall not apply retroactively. This Section shall not 21impair or affect the obligation of any retail installment 22transaction or secured loan entered into before the effective 23date of this amendatory Act of the 103rd General Assembly.24(Source: P.A. 102-128, eff. 1-1-22; 103-339, eff. 1-1-24.) 25    (205 ILCS 660/10.7 new)  HB5290 Enrolled- 34 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    Sec. 10.7. Subpoenas; other remedies.2    (a) The Secretary shall have the power to issue and to 3serve subpoenas and subpoenas duces tecum to compel the 4attendance of witnesses and the production of all books, 5accounts, records, and other documents and materials relevant 6to an examination or investigation. The Secretary, or the 7Secretary's duly authorized representative, shall have power 8to administer oaths and affirmations to any person.9    (b) In the event of noncompliance with a subpoena or 10subpoena duces tecum issued or caused to be issued by the 11Secretary, the Secretary may, through the Attorney General, 12petition the circuit court of the county in which the person 13subpoenaed resides or has its principal place of business for 14an order requiring the subpoenaed person to appear and testify 15and to produce such books, accounts, records, and other 16documents as are specified in the subpoena duces tecum. The 17court may grant injunctive relief restraining the person from 18advertising, promoting, soliciting, entering into, offering to 19enter into, continuing, or completing any sales finance agency 20transaction. The court may grant other relief, including, but 21not limited to, the restraint, by injunction or appointment of 22a receiver, of any transfer, pledge, assignment, or other 23disposition of the person's assets or any concealment, 24alteration, destruction, or other disposition of books, 25accounts, records, or other documents and materials as the 26court deems appropriate, until the person has fully complied   HB5290 Enrolled- 35 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1with the subpoena or subpoena duces tecum and the Secretary 2has completed an investigation or examination.3    (c) The Secretary may, in addition to the other remedies 4provided for in this Act, through the Attorney General, apply 5for relief to the circuit court of the county in which the 6subpoenaed person resides or has its principal place of 7business. The court shall thereupon direct the issuance of an 8order against the subpoenaed person requiring sufficient bond 9conditioned on compliance with the subpoena or subpoena duces 10tecum. The court shall cause to be endorsed on the order a 11suitable amount of bond or payment pursuant to which the 12person named in the order shall be freed, having a due regard 13to the nature of the case.14    (d) In addition, the Secretary may, through the Attorney 15General, seek a writ of attachment or an equivalent order from 16the circuit court having jurisdiction over the person who has 17refused to obey a subpoena, who has refused to give testimony, 18or who has refused to produce the matters described in the 19subpoena duces tecum. 20    (205 ILCS 660/10.8 new)21    Sec. 10.8. Suspension; revocation of licenses; fines. 22    (a) If the Secretary finds any person in violation of the 23grounds set forth in this Section, the Secretary may enter an 24order imposing one or more of the following penalties:25        (1) revocation of license;  HB5290 Enrolled- 36 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1        (2) suspension of a license subject to reinstatement 2    upon satisfying all reasonable conditions the Secretary 3    may specify;4        (3) placement of the licensee or applicant on 5    probation for a period of time and subject to all 6    reasonable conditions as the Secretary may specify;7        (4) issuance of a reprimand;8        (5) imposition of a fine not to exceed $25,000 per 9    violation; except that a fine may be imposed that shall 10    not exceed $75,000 per violation in violation of paragraph 11    (2) or (15) of subsection (b);12        (6) denial of a license; or13        (7) restitution for the benefit of consumers.14    (b) The following acts shall constitute grounds for which 15the disciplinary actions specified in subsection (a) may be 16taken:17        (1) being convicted or found guilty, regardless of 18    pendency of an appeal, of a crime in any jurisdiction that 19    involves fraud, dishonest dealing, or any other act of 20    moral turpitude;21        (2) fraud, misrepresentation, deceit, or negligence in 22    any relation to any sales finance agency activity;23        (3) a material or intentional misstatement of fact on 24    an initial or renewal application;25        (4) any fact or condition exists that, if it had 26    existed at the time of the original application for the   HB5290 Enrolled- 37 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    license, would have warranted the Secretary in refusing to 2    originally issue the license;3        (5) insolvency or filing under any provision of the 4    United States Bankruptcy Code as a debtor;5        (6) failure to account or deliver to any person any 6    property, such as any money, fund, deposit, check, draft, 7    or other document or thing of value, that has come into the 8    person's hands and that is not the person's property or 9    that the person is not in law or equity entitled to retain, 10    under the circumstances and at the time which has been 11    agreed upon or is required by law or, in the absence of a 12    fixed time, upon demand of the person entitled to such 13    accounting and delivery;14        (7) failure to disburse funds in accordance with 15    agreements;16        (8) having a license, or the equivalent, to practice 17    any profession or occupation revoked, suspended, or 18    otherwise acted against, including the denial of licensure 19    by a licensing authority of this State or another state, 20    territory, or country for fraud, dishonest dealing, or any 21    other act of moral turpitude;22        (9) failure to comply with an order of the Secretary 23    or rule adopted under the provisions of this Act;24        (10) engaging in activities regulated by this Act 25    without a current, active license unless specifically 26    exempted by this Act;  HB5290 Enrolled- 38 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1        (11) failure to pay in a timely manner any fee, 2    charge, or fine under this Act;3        (12) failure to maintain, preserve, and keep available 4    for examination all books, accounts, or other documents 5    required by the provisions of this Act and the rules of the 6    Department;7        (13) refusing, obstructing, evading, or unreasonably 8    delaying an investigation, information request, or 9    examination authorized under this Act or refusing, 10    obstructing, evading, or unreasonably delaying compliance 11    with the Secretary's subpoena or subpoena duces tecum;12        (14) failure to comply with or a violation of any 13    provision of this Act; and14        (15) any unfair, deceptive, or abusive business 15    practice.16    (c) No license shall be suspended or revoked, except as 17provided in this Section, nor shall any licensee be fined 18without notice of the licensee's right to a hearing as 19provided in subsection (n).20    (d) The Secretary, on good cause shown that an emergency 21exists, may suspend any license for a period not exceeding 180 22days, pending investigation.23    (e) The provisions of subsection (d) of Section 4.6 shall 24not affect a licensee's civil or criminal liability for acts 25committed before surrender of a license.26    (f) No revocation, suspension, or surrender of any license   HB5290 Enrolled- 39 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1shall impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting 2lawful contract between the licensee and any person.3    (g) Every license issued under this Act shall remain in 4force and effect until the license expires without renewal, is 5surrendered, is revoked, or is suspended in accordance with 6the provisions of this Act, but the Secretary shall have 7authority to reinstate a suspended license or to issue a new 8license to a licensee whose license has been revoked if no fact 9or condition then exists which would have warranted the 10Secretary in refusing originally to issue that license under 11this Act.12    (h) Whenever the Secretary revokes or suspends a license 13issued pursuant to this Act or fines a licensee under this Act, 14the Secretary shall execute a written order to that effect. 15The Secretary shall serve a copy of the order upon the 16licensee. Any such order may be reviewed as provided for in 17this Act.18    (i) The Secretary may fine, suspend, or revoke only the 19particular license with respect to which grounds for the fine, 20revocation, or suspension occur or exist, but if the Secretary 21finds that grounds for revocation are of general application 22to all offices or to more than one office of the licensee, the 23Secretary shall fine, suspend, or revoke every license to 24which the grounds apply.25    (j) No revocation, suspension, or surrender of any license 26shall impair or affect the obligation of any preexisting   HB5290 Enrolled- 40 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1lawful contract between the licensee and any obligor.2    (k) The Secretary may issue a new license to a licensee 3whose license has been revoked when facts or conditions which 4clearly would have warranted the Secretary in refusing 5originally to issue the license no longer exist.6    (l) In every case in which a license is suspended or 7revoked or an application for a license or renewal of a license 8is denied, the Secretary shall serve the licensee with notice 9of the Secretary's action, including a statement of the 10reasons for the actions, either personally or by certified 11mail. Service by certified mail shall be deemed completed when 12the notice is deposited in the United States mail.13    (m) An order assessing a fine, an order revoking or 14suspending a license, or an order denying renewal of a license 15shall take effect upon service of the order unless the 16licensee requests a hearing, in writing, within 15 days after 17the date of service. If a hearing is requested, the order shall 18be stayed until a final administrative order is entered.19        (1) If the licensee requests a hearing, the Secretary 20    shall schedule a preliminary hearing within 30 days after 21    the request for a hearing unless otherwise agreed to by 22    the parties.23        (2) The hearing shall be held at the time and place 24    designated by the Secretary. The Secretary and any 25    administrative law judge designated by the Secretary shall 26    have the power to administer oaths and affirmations,   HB5290 Enrolled- 41 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    subpoena witnesses and compel their attendance, take 2    evidence, and require the production of books, papers, 3    correspondence, and other records or information that the 4    Secretary considers relevant or material to the inquiry.5    (n) The costs of administrative hearings conducted 6pursuant to this Section shall be paid by the licensee.7    (o) A licensee shall be subject to the disciplinary 8actions specified in this Act for violations of subsection (b) 9by any officer, director, shareholder, joint venture, partner, 10ultimate equitable owner, or employee of the licensee.11    (p) A licensee shall be subject to suspension or 12revocation for unauthorized employee actions only if there is 13a pattern of repeated violations by employees, the licensee 14has knowledge of the violations, or there is substantial harm 15to a consumer. A licensee may be subject to fines for employee 16actions, whether authorized or unauthorized, whether there is 17a pattern of repeated violations or no pattern of repeated 18violations.19    (q) Any licensee may submit an application to surrender a 20license, but, upon the Secretary approving the surrender, it 21shall not affect the licensee's civil or criminal liability 22for acts committed before surrender or entitle the licensee to 23a return of any part of the license fee. 24    (205 ILCS 660/12)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5230)25    Sec. 12. Every licensee shall retain such records as are   HB5290 Enrolled- 42 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1required by the Department. Every licensee shall preserve the 2records of each of its transactions for at least 2 years after 3making the final entry for that transaction.4    With the Secretary's Director's approval, a licensee may 5maintain these records at a location other than the licensed 6facility.7    With the Secretary's Director's approval, a licensee may 8contract for servicing of these accounts.9(Source: P.A. 90-437, eff. 1-1-98.) 10    (205 ILCS 660/13)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5231)11    Sec. 13. Rules. 12    (a) In addition to such powers as may be prescribed by this 13Act, the Department is hereby authorized and empowered to 14adopt rules consistent with the purposes of this Act, 15including, but not limited to:16        (1) rules in connection with the activities of 17    licensees or unlicensed sales finance agencies as may be 18    necessary and appropriate for the protection of consumers 19    in this State;20        (2) rules as may be necessary and appropriate to 21    define improper or fraudulent business practices in 22    connection with the activities of licensees in servicing 23    retail installment contracts or retail charge agreements;24        (3) rules that define the terms used in this Act and as 25    may be necessary and appropriate to interpret and   HB5290 Enrolled- 43 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    implement the provisions of this Act; and2        (4) rules as may be necessary for the enforcement and 3    administration of this Act.4    (b) The Secretary is authorized and empowered to make 5specific rulings, demands, and findings that the Secretary 6deems necessary for the proper conduct of the sales finance 7agency industry. 8The Department may make and enforce such reasonable rules, 9regulations, directions, orders, decisions and findings as the 10execution and enforcement of this Act require, and as are not 11inconsistent therewith. In addition, the Department may 12promulgate rules in connection with the activities of 13licensees that are necessary and appropriate for the 14protection of consumers in this State. All rules and 15regulations shall be sent electronically to all licensees.16(Source: P.A. 98-44, eff. 6-28-13.) 17    (205 ILCS 660/13.5 new)18    Sec. 13.5. Appeal and review.19    (a) The Department may, in accordance with the Illinois 20Administrative Procedure Act, adopt rules to provide for 21review within the Department of the Secretary's decisions 22affecting the rights of persons or entities under this Act. 23The review shall provide for, at a minimum:24        (1) appointment of a hearing officer other than a 25    regular employee of the Division of Financial   HB5290 Enrolled- 44 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    Institutions;2        (2) appropriate procedural rules, specific deadlines 3    for filings, and standards of evidence and of proof; and4        (3) provision for apportioning costs among parties to 5    the appeal.6    (b) All final agency determinations of appeals to 7decisions of the Secretary may be reviewed in accordance with 8and under the provisions of the Administrative Review Law. 9Appeals from all final orders and judgments entered by a court 10in review of any final administrative decision of the 11Secretary or of any final agency review of a decision of the 12Secretary may be taken as in other civil cases. 13    (205 ILCS 660/14.5 new)14    Sec. 14.5. Collection of compensation. Unless exempt from 15licensure under this Act, no person engaged in or offering to 16engage in any act or service for which a license under this Act 17is required may bring or maintain any action in any court of 18this State to collect compensation for the performance of the 19licensable services without alleging and proving that the 20person was the holder of a valid sales finance agency license 21under this Act at all times during the performance of those 22services. 23    (205 ILCS 660/15.5)24    Sec. 15.5. Civil action. A claim of violation of this Act   HB5290 Enrolled- 45 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1may be asserted in a civil action. Additionally, a court may 2award reasonable attorney's fees and court costs to a person 3asserting a claim under this Section.4(Source: P.A. 90-437, eff. 1-1-98.) 5    (205 ILCS 660/16.5)6    Sec. 16.5. Cease and desist orders. 7    (a) The Secretary Director may issue a cease and desist 8order to a sales finance agency or other person doing business 9without the required license when, in the opinion of the 10Secretary director, the licensee or other person is violating 11or is about to violate any provision of this Act or any law, 12rule, or requirement imposed in writing by the Department.13    (b) The Secretary Director may issue a cease and desist 14order prior to a hearing.15    (c) The Secretary Director shall serve notice of the 16Secretary's his or her action, designated as a cease and 17desist order made pursuant to this Section, including a 18statement of the reasons for the action, either personally or 19by certified mail, return receipt requested. Service by 20certified mail shall be deemed completed when the notice is 21deposited in the U.S. mail.22    (d) Within 15 days of service of the cease and desist 23order, the sales finance agency or other person may request, 24in writing, a hearing.25    (e) The Secretary Director shall schedule a hearing within   HB5290 Enrolled- 46 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b130 days after the request for a hearing unless otherwise 2agreed to by the parties.3    (f) The Secretary Director shall have the authority to 4prescribe rules for the administration of this Section.5    (g) If it is determined that the Secretary Director had 6the authority to issue the cease and desist order, the 7Secretary he or she may issue such orders as may be reasonably 8necessary to correct, eliminate, or remedy such conduct.9    (h) The powers vested in the Secretary Director by this 10Section are additional to any and all other powers and 11remedies vested in the Secretary Director by law, and nothing 12in this Section shall be construed as requiring that the 13Secretary Director shall employ the powers conferred in this 14Section instead of or as a condition precedent to the exercise 15of any other power or remedy vested in the Secretary Director.16    (i) The cost for the administrative hearing shall be set 17by rule.18(Source: P.A. 90-437, eff. 1-1-98.) 19    (205 ILCS 660/17)  (from Ch. 17, par. 5235)20    Sec. 17. Application of Act. 21    (a) This Act does not apply to any credit union, bank, 22banking association, trust company, savings bank, or savings 23and loan association authorized to do business under the laws 24of this State, any other state, or of the United States.25    (b) This Act does not apply to a person or entity that, in   HB5290 Enrolled- 47 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1connection with a securitization, private placement, or 2similar type of investment transaction, lends against or 3purchases from an Illinois licensed sales finance agency 4retail installment contracts, retail charge agreements, or the 5outstanding balances or any portion of the outstanding 6balances under those contracts or agreements, provided that 7the licensed sales finance agency retains the servicing of the 8agreements or contracts and maintains the records for those 9agreements and contracts.10    (c) This Act does not apply to a special purpose vehicle. 11In this subsection, "special purpose vehicle" means an entity 12that, in connection with a securitization, private placement, 13or similar type of investment transaction, is administered by 14a State or national bank under a management agreement for the 15purpose of purchasing, making loans against, or in pools of, 16receivables, general intangibles, and other financial assets 17including retail installment contracts, retail charge 18agreements, or the outstanding balances or any portion of the 19outstanding balances under those contracts or agreements. 20(Source: P.A. 89-400, eff. 8-20-95.) 21    (205 ILCS 660/19)22    Sec. 19. Injunction; civil penalty; costs. If it appears 23to the Secretary Director that a person has committed or is 24about to commit a violation of this Act, a rule promulgated 25under this Act, or an order of the Secretary Director, the   HB5290 Enrolled- 48 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1Secretary Director may apply to the circuit court for an order 2enjoining the person from violating or continuing to violate 3this Act, the rule, or order and for injunctive or other relief 4that the nature of the case may require and may, in addition, 5request the court to assess a civil penalty up to $10,000 6$1,000 along with costs and attorney's fees.7(Source: P.A. 90-437, eff. 1-1-98.) 8    (205 ILCS 660/5 rep.)9    (205 ILCS 660/6 rep.)10    (205 ILCS 660/7 rep.)11    (205 ILCS 660/8 rep.)12    (205 ILCS 660/8.1 rep.)13    (205 ILCS 660/8.2 rep.)14    (205 ILCS 660/8.3 rep.)15    (205 ILCS 660/8.4 rep.)16    (205 ILCS 660/8.5 rep.)17    (205 ILCS 660/8.6 rep.)18    (205 ILCS 660/8.8 rep.)19    (205 ILCS 660/8.9 rep.)20    (205 ILCS 660/8.10 rep.)21    (205 ILCS 660/8.11 rep.)22    (205 ILCS 660/8.12 rep.)23    (205 ILCS 660/8.13 rep.)24    (205 ILCS 660/8.14 rep.)25    (205 ILCS 660/10 rep.)  HB5290 Enrolled- 49 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    (205 ILCS 660/10.1 rep.)2    (205 ILCS 660/10.3 rep.)3    (205 ILCS 660/10.4 rep.)4    (205 ILCS 660/11 rep.)5    (205 ILCS 660/14 rep.)6    (205 ILCS 660/18 rep.)7    Section 10. The Sales Finance Agency Act is amended by 8repealing Sections 5, 6, 7, 8, 8.1, 8.2, 8.3, 8.4, 8.5, 8.6, 98.8, 8.9, 8.10, 8.11, 8.12, 8.13, 8.14, 10, 10.1, 10.3, 10.4, 1011, 14, and 18. 11    Section 99. Effective date. This Act takes effect upon 12becoming law.  HB5290 Enrolled- 50 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1 INDEX 2 Statutes amended in order of appearance 3    205 ILCS 660/2from Ch. 17, par. 52024    205 ILCS 660/3.5 new5    205 ILCS 660/4from Ch. 17, par. 52046    205 ILCS 660/4.1 new7    205 ILCS 660/4.2 new8    205 ILCS 660/4.3 new9    205 ILCS 660/4.4 new10    205 ILCS 660/4.5 new11    205 ILCS 660/4.6 new12    205 ILCS 660/6.113    205 ILCS 660/6.2 new14    205 ILCS 660/6.3 new15    205 ILCS 660/6.4 new16    205 ILCS 660/6.5 new17    205 ILCS 660/6.6 new18    205 ILCS 660/6.7 new19    205 ILCS 660/6.8 new20    205 ILCS 660/10.2from Ch. 17, par. 522521    205 ILCS 660/10.622    205 ILCS 660/10.7 new23    205 ILCS 660/10.8 new24    205 ILCS 660/12from Ch. 17, par. 523025    205 ILCS 660/13from Ch. 17, par. 5231  HB5290 Enrolled- 51 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    205 ILCS 660/13.5 new2    205 ILCS 660/14.5 new3    205 ILCS 660/15.54    205 ILCS 660/16.55    205 ILCS 660/17from Ch. 17, par. 52356    205 ILCS 660/197    205 ILCS 660/5 rep.8    205 ILCS 660/6 rep.9    205 ILCS 660/7 rep.10    205 ILCS 660/8 rep.11    205 ILCS 660/8.1 rep.12    205 ILCS 660/8.2 rep.13    205 ILCS 660/8.3 rep.14    205 ILCS 660/8.4 rep.15    205 ILCS 660/8.5 rep.16    205 ILCS 660/8.6 rep.17    205 ILCS 660/8.8 rep.18    205 ILCS 660/8.9 rep.19    205 ILCS 660/8.10 rep.20    205 ILCS 660/8.11 rep.21    205 ILCS 660/8.12 rep.22    205 ILCS 660/8.13 rep.23    205 ILCS 660/8.14 rep.24    205 ILCS 660/10 rep.25    205 ILCS 660/10.1 rep.26    205 ILCS 660/10.3 rep.  HB5290 Enrolled- 52 -LRB104 17948 BAB 31385 b1    205 ILCS 660/10.4 rep.2    205 ILCS 660/11 rep.3    205 ILCS 660/14 rep.4    205 ILCS 660/18 rep.